Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201919-2304
Regulation and control of parking vehicles; other means.

Nothing contained in sections 19-2301 to 19-2304 shall prohibit the governing body of any city of the first class, city of the second class, or village from employing any and all other ways and means to regulate and control vehicular parking in such city or village either in conjunction with a system of meters or devices or exclusive and independent thereof.

Laws 1955, c. 61, § 4, p. 193;

Laws 2019, LB193, § 141.
September 1, 2019